Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-102 Accident and health or
sickness insurance policy defined. The term, policy of accident and health
or sickness insurance, includes any policy or contract covering the class of
insurance described in section 431:1-205. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002,
c 155, §50]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next